Utah statutes.
58-60-109.   Unlawful conduct.

As used in this chapter, "unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  practice of the following unless licensed in the appropriate classification or exempted from licensure under this title:

(a)  mental health therapy;

(b)  clinical social work;

(c)  certified social work;

(d)  marriage and family therapy;

(e)  professional counseling;

(f)  practice as a social service worker; or

(g)  licensed substance abuse counselor;

(2)  practice of mental health therapy by a licensed psychologist who has not acceptably documented to the division his completion of the supervised training in mental health therapy required under Subsection 58-61-304(1)(f); or

(3)  representing oneself as or using the title of any of the following unless currently licensed in a license classification under this title:

(a)  psychiatrist;

(b)  psychotherapist;

(c)  registered psychiatric mental health nurse specialist;

(d)  mental health therapist;

(e)  clinical social worker;

(f)  certified social worker;

(g)  marriage and family therapist;

(h)  professional counselor;

(i)  clinical hypnotist;

(j)  social service worker;

(k)  licensed substance abuse counselor;

(l) associate professional counselor; or

(m) associate marriage and family therapist.

